Illinois, session 104th, HB5741.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The following named amount, or so much thereof 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Early Childhood for grants and 7administration expenses associated with support for the 8inclusion of children ages 3 to 5 with developmental delays 9and disabilities in school and community-based early childhood 10settings: 11For the grant recipient of the Early CHOICES initiative, 12  supported by IDEA Part B, Section 61913  discretionary funds................................$500,000 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.